Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1215
Unlawful acts; penalty.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, or other group of individuals, however organized, or any owner, partner, member, officer, director, employee, agent, or representative thereof who willfully or knowingly engages in the business of debt management without the license required by sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 15, p. 1185;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 134;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 413.